en: Cordons bleus
fr: Cordons bleus
hr: Cordons bleus
nl: Cordon bleus

en: Poultry cordons bleus
fr: Cordons bleus de volaille

en: Turkey cordons bleus
bg: Пуешки кордон бльо
fr: Cordons bleus de dinde
hr: Puretina cordons bleus
nl: Kalkoen cordon bleus

en: Reconstituted turkey cordons bleus
fr: Cordons bleus de dinde reconstituée

en: Chicken cordons bleus
bg: Пилешки кордон бльо
fr: Cordons bleus de poulet
hr: Pileći cordons bleus
nl: Kip cordon bleus

en: Reconstituted chicken cordons bleus
fr: Cordons bleus de poulet reconstitué

en: Pork cordons bleus
fr: Cordons bleus de porc

en: Fresh meats
bg: Прясно месо
de: Frischfleisch
es: Carnes frías
fi: tuoreet lihat
fr: Viandes fraîches
he: בשרים טריים
hr: Svježe meso
it: Carne fresca
lt: Šviežia mėsa
nl: Verse vlezen
pt: Carnes frescas
ru: Свежее мясо
tr: Taze et
zh: 鲜肉

en: Fresh ground steaks
de: Frische Hacksteaks
fi: Tuoreet jauhelihapihvit
fr: Steaks hachés frais
hr: Svježe mljevene odreske
nl: Verse tartaarsteaks

en: Fresh meat preparations
de: Frischfleischprodukte
es: Preparados de carne fresca
fi: Tuoreet lihavalmisteet
fr: Préparations de viande fraîches, préparations fraîches de viande
hr: Svježi mesni pripravci
it: Preparazioni fresche a base di carne
lt: Šviežios mėsos gaminiai
nl: Vers vleesproducten

en: Fresh beef preparations
fr: Préparations de viande de bœuf fraîches, préparations de viande bovine fraîches
hr: Svježi goveđi pripravci
nl: Vers rundvlees producten

en: Fresh ground meat preparations
bg: Кайма
de: Frisches Hackfleisch
es: Preparados de carne fresca picada
fi: Tuoreet jauhelihavalmisteet
fr: Préparations de viande hachées fraîches, préparations hachées de viande fraîches
hr: Pripravci od svježeg mljevenog mesa
it: Macinato di carne fresco
nl: Verse gehakte vleesproducten

en: Fresh ground beef steaks
fi: tuoreet naudanjauhelihapihvit
fr: Steaks hachés de bœuf frais, steaks de bœuf hachés frais
hr: Svježe mljevene juneće odreske
nl: Verse rundertartaarsteaks

en: Fresh ground beef preparations
de: Rohe Rinderhackprodukte, verarbeitetes rohes Rinderhackfleisch
fi: Tuoreet nautajauhelihavalmisteet
fr: Préparations de viande bovine hachée fraîches, Préparations hachées de viande de bœuf fraîches, préparations de viande de bœuf hachée fraîches, préparations fraîches de viande bovine hachée, préparations hachées fraîches de viande bovine
hr: Pripravci od svježe mljevene govedine
it: Preparati di manzo fresco
nl: Verse gehakt producten

en: Pork and its products
ca: Carn de porc i derivats
es: Carne de cerdo y sus productos
fr: Porc et dérivés
hr: Svinjetina i proizvodi od nje
lt: Kiauliena ir jos produktai
nl: Varken en afgeleide producten
pl: Wieprzowina i jej produkty
zh: 猪肉及其制品

en: Marinated pork meats
fr: Viandes de porc marinées

en: Pork preparations
fr: Préparations au porc
hr: Pripravci od svinjskog mesa
lt: Kiaulienos gaminiai
nl: Varkensvleesbereidingen, Varkensbereidingen

en: Canned cooked lean pork
es: Magro de cerdo cocido en conserva

en: Pork, Pork meat, swine, swine meat
bg: Свинско
ca: Porc, Carn de porc
da: Svin, svinekød, gris, grisekød
de: Schwein, Schweinefleisch
es: Carne de cerdo
fi: possu
fr: Porc, Viande de porc, Viandes de porc
he: בשר חזיר
hr: Svinjetina
hu: Disznóhús
it: Carne di maiale, Maiale
ja: 豚肉, ぶたにく, 豚にく, ぶた肉, ポーク
lt: Kiauliena
nl: Varken, Varkensvlezen
pl: Wieprzowina, mięso wieprzowe
pt: Carne de porco
ru: Свинина
sv: griskött, fläskkött, gris, fläsk
tr: Domuz eti
zh: 猪肉

en: French pork
fr: Porc français
hr: Francuska svinjetina
lt: Kiauliena iš Prancūzijos